Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 2. Registration
§ 31-2-213.
Department to supply registration certificates, plates and stickers; removable windshield placards.

The department on or before November 1 of each year shall furnish a sufficient quantity of plates or stickers, registration certificates fully completed and ready for reregistration of vehicles registered the previous year and a “vehicle register” to each county treasurer. Each county treasurer shall check and receipt to the department for all plates received and on December 31 of each year shall furnish an abstract showing the number of plates or stickers received and disposed of during the preceding year and the balance on hand which shall be held subject to instructions from the department.

The department may issue license plates, except dealer and antique motor vehicle license plates, which shall be valid for not more than eight (8) years if annual validation stickers are attached in the upper left corner of the license plate with the month and year of expiration clearly visible. Department authorized license plates and annual stickers shall be of colors that are readily distinguishable from the previous year.

The department shall issue a special tamper resistant removable windshield placard to an applicant submitting a letter from his physician or advanced practice registered nurse stating the applicant has a disability that is expected to last a minimum of twelve (12) months which limits or impairs the ability to walk, or to any person responsible for the regular transportation of eligible persons with a disability that is expected to last a minimum of twelve (12) months which limits or impairs the ability to walk who submits such a letter on behalf of an eligible person. The placard shall display the international symbol of access. When a vehicle is parked in an area reserved for the handicapped, the placard shall be suspended from the rearview mirror inside the vehicle, so as to be in plain view of any person looking through the front windshield of the vehicle from the sidewalk or roadside. For motor vehicles which do not have rearview mirrors, the placard shall be displayed on the dashboard of the parked vehicle, on the side nearest the curb or roadside. Upon request, one (1) additional placard shall be issued to applicants who have not been issued special license plates.

As used in this section:

“International symbol of access” means the symbol adopted by rehabilitation international in 1969 at its eleventh world congress on rehabilitation of the disabled;

“Eligible person” means a person with disabilities which limit or impair the ability to walk as determined by a licensed physician or advanced practice registered nurse, including:

An inability to walk two hundred (200) feet without stopping to rest;

An inability to walk without the use of, or assistance from, a brace, cane, crutch, another person, prosthetic device, wheelchair or other assistive device;

A restriction by lung disease to such an extent that the person’s forced expiratory volume for one (1) second when measured by spirometry is less than one (1) liter, or the arterial oxygen tension is less than sixty (60) mm/hg on room air at rest;

Requires use of portable oxygen;

Has a cardiac condition to the extent that the person’s functional limitations are classified in severity as class III or class IV according to standards established by the american heart association;

A severe limitation on the ability to walk due to an arthritic, neurological or orthopedic condition; or

A severe visual or audio impairment that limits the person’s mobility.

“Special license plate” means a license plate that displays the international symbol of access:

In a color that contrasts to the background; and

The plate shall consist of the arabic numerals designating the county in which issued at the left, followed by the bucking horse and rider emblem and a distinctive combination of up to three (3) numbers and letters as determined by the department, followed by the international symbol of access. After the county number on the left-hand end, the license plate may also contain a distinctive symbol or letters, as determined by the department, indicating the vehicle type. A special license plate issued for a motorcycle shall not be less than three (3) inches wide and six (6) inches long and shall contain the international symbol of access and appropriate identification which may be in lieu of the bucking horse and rider emblem.

“Removable windshield placard” means a two (2) sided, tamper resistant, hooked placard which includes on each side:

The international symbol of access, which is at least three (3) inches in height, centered on the placard and is blue or white on a contrasting white or blue background;

An identification number;

The seal or other identification of the issuing authority;

An expiration date.

Application forms for removable windshield placards shall contain the following information:

CONDITIONS AND RESTRICTIONS

Applications for temporary and special removable windshield placards and special license plates, shall be submitted as provided by rules and regulations of the department. The rules and regulations shall conform to federal regulations adopted pursuant to P.L. 100-641, 102 Stat. 3335.

The department shall issue a temporary removable windshield placard under the same procedures and subject to the same conditions as provided in subsections (c) through (e) of this section except:

The disability which limits or impairs the ability to walk shall be one expected to last not more than six (6) months;

The temporary placard shall:

Be of a design readily distinguishable from that of the special placard by having the word “temporary” overprinted on the placard; and

Expire on and bear an expiration date which shall be visible from outside the vehicle when the card is properly displayed under subsection (c) of this section and be based on the information in the physician’s letter.

Effective January 1, 1993, any person eligible for a special placard under subsection (c) of this section may apply to the county treasurer for special license plates for a motor vehicle owned by that person. Special license plates shall not be issued to any person who is eligible only for a temporary removable windshield placard under subsection (g) of this section. Special plates issued under this subsection are subject to the following:

The plates shall be displayed only upon the vehicle for which issued;

The plates shall be the same color as regular motor vehicle license plates and shall display the international symbol of access;

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 127, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 111, § 2.

Any vehicle registered under this subsection is subject to this article except for provisions under W.S.

31-2-204

prescribing the type of number for license plates;

The department shall prepare necessary forms and adopt necessary rules and regulations to implement this subsection;

Any individual who is issued special license plates under this subsection may be issued one (1) placard;

The county treasurer shall issue a set of plates for each vehicle and a special license plate for each motorcycle registered to a qualified applicant under this subsection upon payment of required fees.

Special license plates or removable windshield placards displaying the international symbol of access, as adopted by rehabilitation international in 1969 at its eleventh world congress on rehabilitation of the disabled, is the only symbol recognized in Wyoming for identification of vehicles used for transporting any eligible person under this section. Wyoming recognizes and grants reciprocity to licenses and placards displaying the international symbol of access which have been issued by other states or countries.

Any person who is guilty of fraudulent or other misuse of the permit issued under this section is subject to a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) for the first offense. Upon receiving notice of a conviction under this subsection from the court, the department shall suspend the handicapped parking permit for a period not to exceed sixty (60) days. For a subsequent conviction under this subsection, an individual is subject to a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) and the department shall suspend the handicapped parking permit for a period not to exceed six (6) months.

This placard is nontransferable. It is unlawful to loan this placard to any person for any reason, regardless of whether that person is handicapped.

The placard shall be suspended from the rearview mirror inside the vehicle, so as to be in plain view of any person looking through the windshield of the vehicle from the sidewalk or roadside. For motor vehicles which do not have rearview mirrors, the placard shall be displayed on the dashboard of the parked vehicle, on the side nearest the curb or roadside.

Any fraudulent or other misuse of the placard may result in withdrawal of the placard from the holder pursuant to subsection (k) of this section.

The placard shall be surrendered to the issuing authority upon death of the holder or when the holder is no longer disabled.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1985, ch. 27, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1992, ch. 49, § 1; 1995, ch. 127, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 80, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, § 2; ch. 45, § 1; 2011, ch. 111, §§ 1, 2; 2014 ch. 112, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by ch. 16, § 2, effective January 1, 2010, substituted “in the upper left corner of the license plate with the month and year of expiration clearly visible” for “covering the original year designation on the plate” in (b).

The second 2009 amendment, by ch. 45, § 1, effective July 1, 2009, in (d)(iii)(B), inserted “as determined by the department” and added the second sentence; and inserted “and one (1) special license plate for a motorcycle” in (h)(iv).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, inserted “or advanced practice registered nurse” in the first sentence in (c) and the introductory language of (d)(ii).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, repealed former (h)(iv), which read: “One (1) set of plates and one (1) special license plate for a motorcycle shall be issued by the county treasurer to each qualified applicant under this subsection upon payment of required fees”; and added (h)(viii).

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (d)(iii)(B), added “After the county number on the left-hand end, the license plate may also contain a distinctive symbol or letters, as determined by the department, indicating the vehicle type.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Federal reference. —

P.L. 100-641, referred to in the second sentence in subsection (f), appears as a note following 23 U.S.C. § 402.

§ 31-2-214.
Transfer of ownership.

Except as provided by subsections (b) through (d) of this section, upon transfer of ownership of a vehicle the registration of the vehicle expires and the original owner shall immediately remove the license plates from the vehicle. Within sixty (60) days after acquiring another vehicle for which the license plates would be proper, the original owner may file an application for the transfer of the license registration number to a vehicle acquired by him accompanied by the fees based on the amount which would be due on a new registration as of the date of transfer less any credit for the unused portion of the original registration fees for the original vehicle for the assignment of the plates to the recently acquired vehicle subject to the following:

All vehicles of the current model year as designated by the manufacturer thereof shall, for the payment of the county registration fee thereon, be considered in the first year of service regardless of the date of purchase;

The state fee shall be calculated by multiplying the amount prescribed by W.S. 31-3-101(a)(ii) times the number of full months remaining in the registration year divided by twelve (12) and rounding to the next highest dollar;

If a license registration is transferred from a vehicle where the fee was greater than the vehicle to which the license registration is being transferred, there shall be no refund of fees paid.

Upon transfer of ownership of a vehicle held in joint ownership between two (2) or more of the joint owners, or by a person to the person’s spouse, child, brother, sister or parent, upon application and payment of the proper fee, the county treasurer shall issue a new registration reflecting the changed ownership and cancel the previous registration. The vehicle may then be operated with the same license plates for the remainder of the registration year.

Upon termination of a lease agreement, the balance of registration fees paid for the leased vehicle may be transferred to a replacement motor vehicle, whether owned or leased. The license plates may also be transferred by lessee if the transfer is to a like motor vehicle.

Upon termination of ownership of a motor vehicle, the balance of the existing registration fees which have been paid for the motor vehicle may be transferred to a replacement motor vehicle that is to be leased if the lease occurs within forty-five (45) days after the termination of ownership. The license plates may also be transferred if the transfer is to a like motor vehicle.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1987, ch. 90, § 1; 1994, ch. 12, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, § 2; 2015 ch. 31, § 1, effective January 1, 2016.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010,
substituted “forty-five (45)” for “ten (10)” in (a).

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, in the second sentence in (a), substituted “sixty (60) days” for “forty-five (45) days.”

Purchaser with trade-in receives credit for unused portion of original registration fees. —

According to the provisions of this section, a person who purchases a motor vehicle from a dealer, with his old vehicle given in exchange, will register the new vehicle and receive full credit for the unused portion of the registration fees paid by him in the original registration. State Bd. of Equalization v. Wyoming Auto. Dealers Ass'n, 395 P.2d 741,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1964).

§ 31-2-215.
Disabled veteran's license plates.

A disabled veteran who receives fifty percent (50%) or more service connected disability compensation from the United States department of veteran’s affairs and who is a resident at the time of initial application and renewal application under subsection (b) of this section, may apply for distinctive license plates for a passenger car, pickup truck, motorcycle or multipurpose vehicle owned or leased by him upon registration of the vehicle. These license plates shall be displayed upon the vehicle for which they are issued. A disabled veteran may purchase one (1) additional pair of license plates as provided in this section for either a motorcycle or a multipurpose vehicle upon payment of regular fees provided in this article. The license plates shall bear a distinctive symbol or letters identifying the registrant as a disabled veteran. The department shall prescribe the symbol or letters which shall not include arabic numerals designating the county.

Application for license plates under subsections (a) and (e) of this section shall be annually made to the county treasurer as provided by this article, except application shall be made not less than thirty (30) days before the last day of the applicant’s annual registration month. Application forms shall be available at all county treasurer’s offices. The department may prepare any special forms and issue any rules and regulations necessary to carry out this section.

The county treasurer shall only issue one (1) pair of license plates annually that are exempt as provided by W.S. 31-3-101(b)(xv) to each applicant under this section.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 48, § 2.

In lieu of the disabled veterans plate described in subsection (a) of this section, a veteran who qualifies for a special license plate under this section may select to receive any distinctive license plate authorized by this chapter for which the veteran qualifies and which is related to service in the military. Application for the license plate selected shall be made pursuant to subsection (b) of this section and may require verification by the Wyoming veterans’ commission as otherwise required by this chapter. Unless otherwise provided by law, any veteran applying for a license plate under this subsection shall be responsible for payment of the registration fees prescribed by W.S.

31-3-101

and no additional fee shall be charged.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1987, ch. 164, § 2; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2001, ch. 183, § 1; 2003, ch. 55, § 1; 2005, ch. 37, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, § 2; 2011, ch. 26, § 1; 2015 ch. 93, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 48, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to general registration fees, see §

31-3-101

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), substituted “United States department of veteran’s affairs and who is a resident at the time of application under subsection (b) of this section” for “veteran’s administration,” inserted “other than a bus or motor home” after “motor vehicle”; and in (b), inserted “except application shall be made not less than thirty (30) days before the last day of the applicant's annual registration month” at the end of the first sentence, and deleted the former last sentence which read: “The normal registration fees shall accompany each application.”

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, inserted “commercial vehicle, motorcycle, multipurpose vehicle” and “or leased”; and substituted “this article” for “W.S.

31-2-201

” in (b).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), substituted “subsections (a) and (e)” for “subsection (a),” and added the last sentence; and added (e).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a), substituted “time of initial application and renewal” for “time of application” and “passenger car, pickup truck, motorcycle or multipurpose vehicle” for “motor vehicle, other than a commercial vehicle, motorcycle, multipurpose vehicle, bus or motor home” in the first sentence, and inserted the present second sentence; in (c), inserted “annually that are exempt as provided by W.S. 31-3-101(a)(xv)”; and made related changes.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, repealed former (d), which read: “A veteran who qualifies for a special license plate under this section may apply to the veterans' commission for a veteran license sticker authorized under
W.S. 31-2-204(b) for each vehicle owned and registered under the name of the veteran. Upon verification by the Wyoming veterans' commission that the veteran was honorably discharged from service and specifying the conflict service of the veteran and payment of the fee established by the commission, the commission shall issue the veteran license sticker for each vehicle for which the veteran has paid the fee established by the commission."

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (c) substituted “W.S. 31-3-101(b)(xv)” for “W.S. 31-3-101(a)(xv).”

§ 31-2-216.
Special plates; former prisoners of war.

The county treasurer shall issue one (1) set of special license plates for either a passenger car, truck or motor home owned or leased by a former prisoner of war in accordance with this section for the year 1988 and thereafter.

Any person eligible under subsection (d) of this section for the special license plate provided by this section may apply for additional special license plates upon the payment of any fees required by this act.

The special license plates shall be the same color as regular motor vehicle license plates but shall be designed so as to indicate that the owner of the motor vehicle is a former prisoner of war and need not include arabic numerals for the county.

Any person who, while serving in the armed forces of the United States, was incarcerated by an enemy of the United States during a period of conflict with the United States may use the special license plate for former prisoners of war provided by this section. Any applicant for special license plates under this section shall be a Wyoming resident at the time of application.

Vehicles registered under this section are subject to all other provisions of this article except those relating to the type of number license plates under W.S.

31-2-204

.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no fee shall be charged for the license plates provided by this section.

All applications for special license plates provided by this section shall be made directly to the county treasurer at least thirty (30) days before registration of the vehicle expires. The department may prepare any special forms and issue any rules and regulations necessary to carry out this section.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 48, § 2.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 164, § 1; 2001, ch. 183, § 1; 2003, ch. 55, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, § 2; 2017 ch. 48, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, inserted “or leased” in (a).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, repealed former (h), which read: “A veteran who qualifies for a special license plate under this section may apply to the veterans' commission for a veteran license sticker authorized under W.S 31-2-204(b) for each vehicle owned and registered under the name of the veteran. Upon verification by the Wyoming veterans' commission that the veteran was honorably discharged from service and specifying the conflict service of the veteran and payment of the fee established by the commission, the commission shall issue the veteran license sticker for each vehicle for which the veteran has paid the fee established by the commission.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as referred to in subsection (b), see § 31-1-101(a)(xxii).

§ 31-2-217.
Special plates; Pearl Harbor survivors; national guard members; armed forces veterans; purple heart recipients.

The county treasurer shall issue one (1) set of special license plates to each applicant for either a passenger car, truck, motorcycle, handicapped motorcycle or motor home owned or leased by a survivor of Pearl Harbor, a member of the Wyoming army or air national guard a purple heart recipient or honorably discharged veteran of the United States armed forces in accordance with this section for the year 1990 and thereafter. For the year 1993 and thereafter, the county treasurer shall issue one (1) set of special license plates to each applicant for either a passenger car, truck, motorcycle, handicapped motorcycle or motor home owned by a purple heart recipient. These license plates shall be displayed upon the vehicle for which they are issued.

Application for license plates under subsection (a) of this section shall be annually made to the county treasurer as provided by this article. Application forms shall be available at all county treasurer’s offices. The registration fees prescribed by W.S.

31-3-101

shall accompany each application, except as provided in subsection (j), no additional fee shall be charged for the license plates provided by this section.

Any person eligible under subsection (e) of this section for the special license plate provided by this section may apply for additional special license plates upon the payment of any fees required by this act.

The special license plates shall be the same color as regular motor vehicle license plates, but shall bear a distinctive symbol or letters identifying the registrant as a survivor of Pearl Harbor, a member of the Wyoming army or air national guard, a purple heart recipient or as a veteran of the United States armed forces. The armed forces license plate shall specify the branch of service in which the applicant served, or is serving. The department shall prescribe the symbol or letters which need not include arabic numerals designating the county. The symbol or letters for a survivor of Pearl Harbor license plate shall be different from the symbol or letters for a national guard member, and for the armed forces license plate as well as a purple heart recipient license plate.

Any person who is a Wyoming resident at the time of application may apply under this section for:

A national guard license plate if he presents documentation that he:

Is currently serving in an active or retired status of the Wyoming national guard; or

Is the surviving spouse of a deceased Wyoming national guard member who was issued a license plate under this paragraph prior to death and the spouse is drawing a military survivor annuity.

A Pearl Harbor survivor license plate if he presents documentation that he:

Was a member of the United States Armed Forces on December 7, 1941;

Was on station on December 7, 1941, during the hours of 7:55 a.m. to 9:45 a.m. Hawaii time at Pearl Harbor, the island of Oahu, or offshore at a distance not to exceed three (3) miles; and

Received an honorable discharge from the United States Armed Forces; or

Is the surviving spouse of a deceased survivor of Pearl Harbor otherwise complying with subparagraphs (A) through (C) of this paragraph.

A purple heart recipient license plate if he is an official recipient of the United States military purple heart award with document proof thereof. The surviving spouse of a deceased purple heart award recipient who was issued a license plate under this paragraph prior to death shall be permitted to retain the license plate until the license plate is required to be replaced with a new license plate;

An armed forces license plate by presenting documentation that he is an honorably discharged veteran of the United States armed forces.

Vehicles registered under this section are subject to all other provisions of this article except those relating to the type of number license plates under W.S.

31-2-204

.

All applications for special license plates provided by this section shall be made directly to the county treasurer at least thirty (30) days before registration of the vehicle expires. The department may prepare any special forms and issue any rules and regulations necessary to carry out this section.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 48, § 2.

Each applicant for an armed forces special license plate shall submit an application fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) upon which the Wyoming veteran’s commission shall issue a written statement establishing the applicant’s eligibility to receive an armed forces license plate from the county treasurer. Fees collected under this subsection shall be deposited into the veterans’ commission expendable trust fund. Application for and any renewal of an armed forces special license plate shall be subject to the requirements of this article and the payment of the fee required by W.S. 31-3-102(a)(viii).

The department of transportation shall include within its biennial budget request submitted under W.S.

9-2-1013

a report identifying the actions taken and monies expended pursuant to this section for each of the immediately preceding two (2) fiscal years.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 251, § 1; 1991, ch. 86, § 1; ch. 241, § 3; 2001, ch. 183, § 1; ch. 198, § 1; 2003, ch. 55, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, § 2; ch. 80, § 1, ch. 179, § 1; 2010, ch. 40, § 1; 2014 ch. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2017 ch. 48, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 2, effective January 1, 2010, inserted “or leased” in the first sentence of (a); and substituted “this article” for “W.S.

31-2-201

” in (b).

The second 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 80, § 1, added the (e)(i)(A) and (e)(i)(B) designations and added the second sentence in (e)(iii).

Laws 2009, ch. 80, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 27, 2009.

The third 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 179, § 1, effective January 1, 2010, in (a), inserted “motorcycle, handicapped motorcycle” preceding “or motor home” in two places and, in the second sentence, inserted “a purple heart recipient or honorably discharged veteran of the United States armed forces” following “air national guard”; in (b), inserted “except as provided in subsection (j),” preceding “no additional fee”; in (d), in the first sentence, added “or as a veteran of the United States armed forces” at the end, added the second sentence, and in the last sentence, inserted “and for the armed forces” preceding “license plate”; added (e)(iv); and added (j).

While none of the amendments gave effect to the others, all have been given
effect in this section as set out above.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (j), substituted “an application fee of twenty dollars ($20.00)” for “a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00),” substituted “Fees collected under this subsection” for “The fee,” substituted “veterans' commission expendable trust fund” for “highway fund,” and added the third sentence; and added (k).

The 2014 amendment,

rewrote (k).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, repealed former (h), which read: “A veteran who qualifies for a special license plate under this section may apply to the veterans' commission for a veteran license sticker authorized under W.S 31-2-204(b) for each vehicle owned and registered under the name of the veteran. Upon verification by the Wyoming veterans' commission that the veteran was honorably discharged from service and specifying the conflict service of the veteran and payment of the fee established by the commission, the commission shall issue the veteran license sticker for each vehicle for which the veteran has paid the fee established by the commission.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-1-101(a)(xxii).

§ 31-2-218.
Firefighter's license plates.

A firefighter employed by a city, county, state or duly created fire protection district, a volunteer firefighter as defined by W.S. 35-9-616(a)(x) or a firefighter retired from his department with at least ten (10) years of service may apply for distinctive license plates for any motor vehicle that is not a commercial vehicle or multipurpose vehicle owned or leased by him upon registration of the vehicle. If the firefighter became a member of a bona fide fire department after January 1, 1995, he shall have a minimum of one (1) year service with the fire department and be firefighter one certified or engine boss wildfire certified in order to apply for the license plate. The fire chief or his designated assistant shall sign a written statement that the applicant is eligible to obtain the license plate. A written statement of eligibility for a retired firefighter shall be signed only by the fire chief. License plates issued under this section shall be displayed upon the vehicle for which they are issued. The license plates shall bear a distinctive symbol and letters identifying the registrant as a firefighter.

Application for license plates under subsection (a) of this section shall be annually made to the county treasurer as provided by this article. The written statement of eligibility required under subsection (a) of this section shall be presented to the county treasurer before a license plate may be issued, provided that the written statement shall only be required for a retired firefighter at the time of first application and shall not be required for renewals or subsequent applications by the same retired firefighter. Application forms shall be available at all county treasurer’s offices. The fee required under W.S. 31-3-102(a)(viii) shall accompany each application.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section for a retired firefighter, no license plate or renewal sticker shall be issued under this section without written statement of eligibility required under subsection (a) of this section. All applications for special license plates provided by this section shall be made directly to the county treasurer at least thirty (30) days before registration of the vehicle expires.

The department of transportation may prepare any special forms and issue any rules and regulations necessary to carry out this section. A license plate issued under this section shall meet the Wyoming department of transportation’s requirements under W.S. 31-2-217(d) relating to the symbol or letters appearing on the license plate.

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 98, § 2.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 6, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, § 2; 2012, ch. 98, § 2; 2013 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, in (a), inserted “that is not a commercial vehicle or multipurpose vehicle” and “or leased”; and substituted “this article” for “W.S.

31-2-201

” in (b).

The 2012 amendment,

repealed former (e), which read: “Unless one thousand (1,000) license plates are issued under this section before December 31, 2008, the plate authorized under this section shall be eliminated from production and the department of transportation shall report the cessation of production to the legislature not later than January 15, 2009.”

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted the comma for “or” following “protection district,” added “or a firefighter retired from his department with at least ten (10) years of service” following “ W.S.

35-9-601

,” and added the fourth sentence in (a).

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, in (b), inserted “provided that the written statement shall only be required for a retired firefighter at the time of first application and shall not be required for renewals or subsequent applications by the same retired firefighter” at the end of the second sentence, and substituted “Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section for a retired firefighter, no” for “No” at the beginning of (c).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, toward the beginning substituted “35-9-616(a)(x)” for “35-9-601.”

§ 31-2-219.
University of Wyoming license plates.

Any person required to register a vehicle in Wyoming pursuant to this article may apply to the University of Wyoming for a statement of eligibility for distinctive University of Wyoming license plates for any motor vehicle that is not a commercial vehicle or multipurpose vehicle owned or leased by the applicant upon registration of the vehicle. Upon payment by the applicant of a fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00) established and assessed by the University of Wyoming, the university shall issue a written statement of eligibility for University of Wyoming license plates. Application shall be made at least thirty (30) days before registration of the vehicle expires. Any fees collected under this section shall be payable to the University of Wyoming, shall be deposited in a separate account and are continuously appropriated for use as provided in W.S.

21-17-118

. The fee authorized under this section may be increased annually up to the percentage increase as shown by the Wyoming cost-of-living index as determined by the division of economic analysis of the department of administration and information.

License plates issued under this section shall be displayed upon the vehicle for which they are issued.

Except as provided in this section, application for, issuance and renewal of University of Wyoming license plates shall be subject to the same requirements and fees as provided in this article. The fee required under W.S. 31-3-102(a)(viii) shall accompany each application.

The department shall prescribe the design of the special license plate authorized by this section, which shall include an image of the bucking horse and rider as described in W.S.

8-3-117

, in consultation with the University of Wyoming, the University of Wyoming Alumni Association and the secretary of state’s office, and arrange for production of the license plates. Following initial approval, University of Wyoming plates shall be subject to redesign on the same schedule as all license plates beginning with the year 2017 reissuance. The license plates shall be issued by the county treasurer of each county.

The department may prepare any special forms and issue any rules and regulations necessary to carry out this section.

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 98, § 2.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 213, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, § 2; 2012, ch. 98, § 2.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 213, § 2, enacts this section effective January 1, 2008.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010,
in (a), substituted “this article” for “W.S.

31-2-201

,” inserted “that is not a commercial vehicle or multipurpose vehicle” and “or leased.”

The 2012 amendment,

repealed former (f), which read: “Unless one thousand (1,000) sets of license plates are issued under this section before December 31, 2016, the plate authorized under this section shall be eliminated from production and the department shall report the cessation of production to the legislature not later than January 15, 2017.”

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.